Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.220.070

Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of licensing, shall adopt rules for implementing RCW 46.20.075(1)(d).

[ 2000 c 115 s 11.]

NOTES:

Finding—2000 c 115: See note following RCW 46.20.075.